Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5311.02
Voluntary compliance.

The director shall make every effort to obtain voluntary compliance through warning, conference, or any other appropriate means prior to initiating enforcement proceedings, except that such requirement shall not be construed to alter enforcement duties or requirements of the director and the department.

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 23;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 619.